Massachusetts, session 194th, S913.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 118 E, Section 13C is hereby amended by inserting at the end
thereof the following:
The secretary of the executive office shall have the responsibility for establishing rates of
payment for by efficiently and economically operated Adult Day Health Service providers in
providing Adult Day Health Services in conformity with federal and state law, regulations and
quality and safety standards; provided, that the secretary may designate another governmental
unit to perform such ratemaking functions.
When establishing rates of payment for Adult Day Health Services, the secretary of the
executive office shall adjust rates to take into account factors, including, but not limited to:
of 3

(i) the reasonable cost to Adult Day Health Service providers of any existing or new
governmental mandate that has been enacted, promulgated or imposed by any governmental unit
or federal governmental authority;
(ii) a cost adjustment actor, to reflect changes in reasonable costs of goods, services, and
transportation, of Adult Day Health programs including those attributed to wages and benefits,
which shall not be less than the HCP CPI;
(iii) establishing wages and benefits comparable to direct care staff in other health care
settings;
(iv) individual ADH Provider differences in real estate and capital costs, including rent,
furniture, fixtures, and equipment, and any other capital costs.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E, Section 13D is amended after the second paragraph by
inserting the following:
Such rates for Adult Day Services shall be established as of July 1 biennially.
SECTION 3. Chapter 118E, Section 13D is amended by inserting at the end thereof the
following:
Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, MassHealth
shall reimburse Adult Day Health Programs to reserve a program slot for members for up to 20
medical leave-of-absence days per year and for up to 10 non-medical leave-of-absence annually;
provided further, that no Adult Day Health Programs shall reassign a participant’s slot during a
leave of absence that is eligible for reimbursement under this section a medical leave of absence
of 3

shall include any medically necessary absence on a schedule day, a non-medical leave of absence
shall include any other absence on a scheduled day.
of 3